Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201681-3422
Professional engineer, defined.

Professional engineer means a person who is licensed by the board to practice engineering. The board may designate a professional engineer, on the basis of education, experience, and examination, as being licensed in a specific discipline of engineering signifying an area in which the professional engineer has demonstrated competence.

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 22;

Laws 2015, LB23, § 20.